Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-312
Unlawful employment; evidence; visitation; reports; enforcement, powers.

The presence of a child under sixteen years of age, apparently at work, in a place of employment as defined in section 48-301 is prima facie evidence of his or her employment there. The Department of Labor, any agent or employee of the department, or any attendance officer may visit the places of employment to ascertain whether any children are employed contrary to sections 48-302 to 48-313, and such attendance officer report any cases of illegal employment to the department and to the county attorney. The Commissioner of Labor may subpoena records from any employer suspected of violating sections 48-302 to 48-313.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. IV, art. III, § 12, p. 557;

C.S.1922, § 7680;

C.S.1929, § 48-312;

R.S.1943, § 48-312;

Laws 1967, c. 296, § 8, p. 809;

Laws 1995, LB 330, § 6;

Laws 2024, LB906, § 2.